Utah statutes.
76-10-706.   Unlawful acts by director, officer or agent.
Every director, officer, or agent of any corporation or association who
knowingly receives or possesses himself of any property of such corporation or
association, otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and who, with intent
to defraud, omits to make, or to cause or direct to be made, a full and true
entry thereof in the books or accounts of the corporation or association; and
every director, officer, agent, or member of any corporation or association
who embezzles, abstracts, or willfully misapplies any of the money, funds, or
credits of the corporation or association; or who, without authority from the
directors, issues or puts in circulation any of the notes of the corporation
or association; or who, without the authority, issues or puts forth any
certificate of deposit, draws any order or bill of exchange, makes any
acceptance, assigns any note, bond, draft, bill of exchange, mortgage,
judgment, or decree; or who makes any false entry in any book, report, or
statement of the corporation or association; or who issues any fraudulent,
fictitious, or illegal stock in any such corporation or association, with
intent in either case to injure or defraud the corporation or association, or
any other company, body politic, or corporate, or any individual person, or to
deceive any officer of the corporation or association, or any agent appointed
to examine the affairs of any such corporation or association; and every
person who, with like intent, aids or abets any officer, clerk, or agent in
any violation of this section is guilty of a felony of the third degree.
